District of Columbia statutes.
25-119

Importation permit requirements and qualifications.

(a)

An importation permit shall authorize the licensee to import, transport, or cause to be imported or transported, alcoholic beverages into the District. An importation permit shall be issued to the licensee under a retailer’s license, class A, B, C, or D, and a pool buying agent if the Board is satisfied that the alcoholic beverages bearing the same brand or trade name are not obtainable by the licensee from a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler in the District in sufficient quantity to reasonably satisfy the immediate needs of the licensee and when the licensee has paid the appropriate taxes as imposed by Chapter 9.

(b)

The permit shall specifically set forth the quantity, character, and brand or trade name of the alcoholic beverage to be transported and the names and addresses of the seller and the licensee.

(c)

The permit shall accompany the alcoholic beverages during transportation in the District to the licensed premises of the licensee and shall be exhibited upon the demand of any police officer or duly authorized inspector of the Board.

(d)

The permit shall, immediately upon receipt of the alcoholic beverages by the retail licensee, be marked “canceled” by the licensee and the canceled permit maintained for 3 years.

History

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 332, ch. 4, § 23
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 3
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 1014, 1015, ch. 600, §§ 1, 2
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 901, 903, ch. 756, §§ 11, 17
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 135, ch. 146, title V, § 505
May 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 113, ch. 218, title VIII, § 801
Mar. 31, 1956, 70 Stat. 81, ch. 154, title III, §§ 301, 302(a)
July 25, 1958, 72 Stat. 418, Pub. L. 85-558, §§ 1-5
Sept. 14, 1961, 75 Stat. 510, Pub. L. 87-238, §§ 1-5
Mar. 2, 1962, 76 Stat. 17, Pub. L. 87-408, § 401
Sept. 30, 1966, 80 Stat. 855, Pub. L. 89-610, title I, § 101(a)
Oct. 31, 1969, 83 Stat. 175, Pub. L. 91-106, title V, § 501(a), (b)
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, § 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(b)(9), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-159, § 25(b), (c), 32 DCR 30
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 7(a), 36 DCR 4160
May 4, 1990, D.C. Law 8-119, § 2, 37 DCR 1738
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187,§ 401(e), 51 DCR 6525
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 47(d)(1), 53 DCR 6794
Mar. 9, 2016, D.C. Law 21-84, § 2(a)(7), 63 DCR 781

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 25-119.
1973 Ed., § 25-124.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-187, in subsec. (a), substituted “An importation permit shall be issued to the licensee under a retailer’s license, class A, B, C, or D, and a pool buying agent” for “An importation permit shall be issued to the licensee under a retailer’s license, class A, B, C, or D,”.
D.C. Law 16-191, in subsec. (a), validated a previously made technical correction.
The 2016 amendment by D.C. Law 21-84 added “and the canceled permit maintained for 3 years” in (d).

Editor's Notes

Sections 402 and 403 of D.C. Law 15-187 provided:

“Sec. 402. Rules and regulations.

“The Mayor shall promulgate proposed rules and regulations to administer this title within 180 days of its effective date. The proposed rules and regulations, as well as any subsequent rules and regulations amending this title, shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess, If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules and regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution with the 45-day review period, the proposed rules and regulations shall be deemed approved.

“Sec. 403. Applicability.

“Section 401 shall apply upon the effective date of the regulations promulgated under section 402.”